Wisconsin, session 2025, AB262.
do enact as follows:AB262,11Section 1. 767.225 (1) (am) of the statutes is amended to read:AB262,2,92767.225 (1) (am) Upon the request of a party, granting periods of physical 3placement to a party in a manner consistent with s. 767.41. The court shall make 4a determination under this paragraph within 30 days after the request for a 5temporary order regarding periods of physical placement is filed. If the court 6grants physical placement to one parent for less than 25 50 percent of the time, as 7determined under s. 49.22 (9), the court shall enter specific findings of fact as to the 8reasons that a greater allocation of physical placement with that parent is not in the 9best interests of the child.AB262,210Section 2. 767.41 (6) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB262,2,1711767.41 (6) (a) If legal custody or physical placement is contested, the court 12shall state in writing why its findings relating to legal custody or physical 13placement are in the best interest of the child. If the court grants physical 14placement to one parent for less than 25 50 percent of the time, as determined 15under s. 49.22 (9), the court shall enter specific findings of fact as to the reasons 16that a greater allocation of physical placement with that parent is not in the best 17interests of the child.AB262,318Section 3. Initial applicability.AB262,2,2019(1) This act first applies to an order regarding physical placement issued on 20the effective date of this subsection.AB262,421Section 4. Effective date.AB262,3,21(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 7th month beginning after 2publication.AB262,3,33